Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-225
Commissioner of Labor; convey property to city of Omaha.

The Commissioner of Labor is hereby authorized and empowered to sell and convey, after June 30, 1981, the following described property: The north sixty-six feet of lots two and three, also described as the north one-half of lots two and three, and the north twenty-five feet of the south one-half of lots two and three, all in block two, Kountze and Ruth's addition to the city of Omaha, Douglas County, Nebraska.

Laws 1980, LB 914, § 1.